Hawaii statutes.
§334-11 Service
area boards. (a) A service area board shall be established to advise each
service area administrator. Each board shall consist of nine members appointed
by the governor, who shall serve for terms to be determined by the governor.
After the initial appointees, the governor shall fill each vacancy on a board
by appointing a member from a list of four persons submitted by that board,
except that, if the board is unable to achieve a quorum at two consecutive
meetings called for the purpose of making such a list, the list may be provided
by a group of at least seven service area consumers and nonproviders of mental
health services. This group shall consist of all board members willing to
participate in making the list and other area consumers and nonproviders of
mental health services to be selected by the service area board chairperson and
service area administrator. Any meeting called for the purpose of making the
list shall be subject to part I of chapter 92. The members of the board shall
be service area residents, who are consumers or nonproviders of mental health
services and service area providers with a majority being non-state employees
and nonproviders of mental health or other health services.

Each board shall
elect a chairperson from among its members. All members shall serve without
compensation but shall be paid their necessary expenses in attending meetings
of the board.

(b) Each service
area administrator and board, in consultation with public and private
providers, shall participate in the development of comprehensive integrated
service area plans and budgets. Each board shall advise the service area
administrator about service area needs to prevent and treat mental or emotional
disorders, combined mental illness substance abuse disorders, and persons
afflicted by these disorders, and provide advice, guidance, and recommendations
to both the advisory commission on drug abuse and controlled substances,
section 329-2, and the state council on mental health, section 334-10, as they
deem appropriate.

(c) If a service
area administrator's actions are not in conformance with the board's planning
decisions, the service area administrator shall provide a written explanation
to the board. [L 1984, c 218, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 6, §1; am L 1987, c
14, §1; am L 1993, c 210, §3; am L 2004, c 79, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next